Utah statutes.
49-13-406.   Part-time elective or appointive service -- Computation of
allowance.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title, elective or appointive
service rendered on a basis not considered full time by the office, unless
otherwise provided by this chapter, shall have a separate allowance computed
on the basis of compensation actually received by the member during the period
of elective or appointive service.
